dict-vec-IT-oxt/dictionaries/vec-IT.aff
FLAG long
SFX xM ïèser iserà/J1I1 ïèser	ds:indicative+future is:first+singular	# T4 + rà
SFX xM ïèser iseremo/J2 ïèser	ds:indicative+future is:first+plural	# T4 + r[éí]mo
SFX xM ïèser iserémoi/I2 ïèser	ds:indicative+future is:first+plural ds:interrogative	# T4 + r[éí]mo
SFX xM ïèser iserimo/J2 ïèser	ds:indicative+future is:first+plural	# T4 + r[éí]mo
SFX xM ïèser iserímoi/I2 ïèser	ds:indicative+future is:first+plural ds:interrogative	# T4 + r[éí]mo
SFX xM ïèser iserà/J3I3 ïèser	ds:indicative+future is:second+singular	# T4 + rà
SFX xM ïèser iseras/J3I3 ïèser	ds:indicative+future is:second+singular	# T4 + rà
SFX xM ïèser iseré/J3I3 ïèser	ds:indicative+future is:second+singular	# T4 + ré
SFX xM ïèser iseres/J3I3 ïèser	ds:indicative+future is:second+singular	# T4 + ré
SFX xM ïèser iseré/J4I4 ïèser	ds:indicative+future is:second+plural	# T4 + ré
SFX xM ïèser iserí/J4I4 ïèser	ds:indicative+future is:second+plural	# T4 + rí
SFX xM ïèser iserà ïèser	ds:indicative+future is:third	# T4 + rà
SFX xM ïèser iserà-l/J5 ïèser	ds:indicative+future is:third ds:interrogative	# T4 + rà
SFX xM ïèser iserà-ƚo/j5 ïèser	ds:indicative+future is:third ds:interrogative	# T4 + rà
SFX xM ïèser isería ïèser	ds:conditional+present is:first+singular	# T4 + ría
SFX xM ïèser iserésimo ïèser	ds:conditional+present is:first+plural	# T4 + résimo
SFX xM ïèser iserísimo ïèser	ds:conditional+present is:first+plural	# T4 + rísimo
SFX xM ïèser isería/J3j3I3 ïèser	ds:conditional+present is:second+singular	# T4 + ría
SFX xM ïèser iseresi/J4I4 ïèser	ds:conditional+present is:second+plural	# T4 + rési
SFX xM ïèser iserisi/J4I4 ïèser	ds:conditional+present is:second+plural	# T4 + rési, padoan
SFX xM ïèser iseresi/J3 ïèser	ds:conditional+present is:second+singular	# T4 + rési
SFX xM ïèser iserisi/J3 ïèser	ds:conditional+present is:second+singular	# T4 + rési, padoan
SFX xM ïèser iserésitu/j3I3 ïèser	ds:conditional+present is:second+singular ds:interrogative	# T4 + rési
SFX xM ïèser iserísitu/j3I3 ïèser	ds:conditional+present is:second+singular ds:interrogative	# T4 + rési, padoan
SFX xM ïèser isería ïèser	ds:conditional+present is:third	# T4 + ría
SFX xM ïèser iseríe-l/J5 ïèser	ds:conditional+present is:third ds:interrogative	# T4 + ría
SFX xM ïèser iseríel/I5 ïèser	ds:conditional+present is:third ds:interrogative	# T4 + ría
SFX xM ïèser iseríeƚo/i5 ïèser	ds:conditional+present is:third ds:interrogative	# T4 + ría
SFX xM ïèser iserave/J1FS ïèser	ds:conditional+present is:first+singular	# T4 + rà(v)e
SFX xM ïèser iseràvemi/I1 ïèser	ds:conditional+present is:first+singular ds:interrogative	# T4 + rà(v)e
SFX xM ïèser iserave/J6FS ïèser	ds:conditional+present is:first+plural	# T4 + rà(v)e
SFX xM ïèser iseràvemi/I6 ïèser	ds:conditional+present is:first+plural ds:interrogative	# T4 + rà(v)e
SFX xM ïèser iserave/J3FS ïèser	ds:conditional+present is:second+singular	# T4 + rà(v)e
SFX xM ïèser iseràvetu/j3I3 ïèser	ds:conditional+present is:second+singular ds:interrogative	# T4 + rà(v)e
SFX xM ïèser iserave/J4FS ïèser	ds:conditional+present is:second+plural	# T4 + rà(v)e
SFX xM ïèser iseràveu/I4 ïèser	ds:conditional+present is:second+plural ds:interrogative	# T4 + rà(v)e
SFX xM ïèser iserave/FS ïèser	ds:conditional+present is:third	# T4 + rà(v)e
SFX xM ïèser iserave-l/A1 ïèser	ds:conditional+present is:third ds:interrogative	# T4 + rà(v)e
SFX xM ïèser iserise-l/A1 ïèser	ds:conditional+present is:third ds:interrogative	# T4 + rà(v)e
SFX xM ïèser iserave-ƚo/A1 ïèser	ds:conditional+present is:third ds:interrogative	# T4 + rà(v)e
SFX xM ïèser iserise-ƚo/A1 ïèser	ds:conditional+present is:third ds:interrogative	# T4 + rà(v)e
SFX xM ïèser iseràvel/A1 ïèser	ds:conditional+present is:third ds:interrogative	# T4 + rà(v)e
SFX xM ïèser iserísel/A1 ïèser	ds:conditional+present is:third ds:interrogative	# T4 + rà(v)e
SFX xM ïèser iseràveƚo/A1 ïèser	ds:conditional+present is:third ds:interrogative	# T4 + rà(v)e
SFX xM ïèser iseríseƚo/A1 ïèser	ds:conditional+present is:third ds:interrogative	# T4 + rà(v)e
SFX xM ïèser iserae/J1 ïèser	ds:conditional+present is:first+singular	# T4 + rà(v)e
SFX xM ïèser iseràemi/I1 ïèser	ds:conditional+present is:first+singular ds:interrogative	# T4 + rà(v)e
SFX xM ïèser iserae/J6 ïèser	ds:conditional+present is:first+plural	# T4 + rà(v)e
SFX xM ïèser iseràemi/I6 ïèser	ds:conditional+present is:first+plural ds:interrogative	# T4 + rà(v)e
SFX xM ïèser iserae/J3I3 ïèser	ds:conditional+present is:second+singular	# T4 + rà(v)e
SFX xM ïèser iseràetu/j3I3 ïèser	ds:conditional+present is:second+singular ds:interrogative	# T4 + rà(v)e
SFX xM ïèser iserae/J4I4 ïèser	ds:conditional+present is:second+plural	# T4 + rà(v)e
SFX xM ïèser iserae ïèser	ds:conditional+present is:third	# T4 + rà(v)e
SFX xM ïèser iseríse-l/J5 ïèser	ds:conditional+present is:third ds:interrogative	# T4 + rà(v)e
SFX xM ïèser iseríse-ƚo/j5 ïèser	ds:conditional+present is:third ds:interrogative	# T4 + rà(v)e
SFX xM ïèser iseràl/I5 ïèser	ds:indicative+future is:third ds:interrogative	# T4 + rà
SFX xM ïèser iseràƚo/i5 ïèser	ds:indicative+future is:third ds:interrogative	# T4 + rà
SFX xM ïèser isemo/J2 ïèser	ds:indicative+present is:first+plural	# T5 + mo
SFX xM ïèser isémoi/I2 ïèser	ds:indicative+present is:first+plural ds:interrogative	# T5 + mo
SFX xM ïèser isimo/J2 ïèser	ds:indicative+present is:first+plural	# T5 + mo
SFX xM ïèser isímoi/I2 ïèser	ds:indicative+present is:first+plural ds:interrogative	# T5 + mo
SFX xM ïèser isè/J4I4 ïèser	ds:indicative+present is:second+plural	# T5
SFX xM ïèser isé/J4I4 ïèser	ds:indicative+present is:second+plural	# T5
SFX xM ïèser isí/J4I4 ïèser	ds:indicative+present is:second+plural	# T5
SFX xM ïèser isié/J4I4 ïèser	ds:indicative+present is:second+plural	# T12 + é
SFX xM ïèser isipiemo ïèser	ds:subjunctive+present is:first+plural	# T5 + mo
SFX xM ïèser isipimo ïèser	ds:subjunctive+present is:first+plural	# T5 + mo
SFX xM ïèser isipié ïèser	ds:subjunctive+present is:second+plural	# T5
SFX xM ïèser isipiè ïèser	ds:subjunctive+present is:second+plural	# T5
SFX xM ïèser isipí ïèser	ds:subjunctive+present is:second+plural	# T5
SFX xM ïèser iseré/J4I4 ïèser	ds:imperative+present is:second+plural	# T5
SFX xM ïèser iseré-ge/R0 ïèser	ds:imperative+present is:second+plural ds:pronomenal+locative	# T5
SFX xM ïèser iserí/J4I4 ïèser	ds:imperative+present is:second+plural	# T5
SFX xM ïèser iserí-ge/R0 ïèser	ds:imperative+present is:second+plural ds:pronomenal+locative	# T5
SFX xM ïèser isemo ïèser	ds:imperative+present is:first+plural	# T5 + mo
SFX xM ïèser isemo-ge/R0 ïèser	ds:imperative+present is:first+plural ds:pronomenal+locative	# T5 + mo
SFX xM ïèser isémoge/R3 ïèser	ds:imperative+present is:first+plural	# T5 + mo
SFX xM ïèser isimo ïèser	ds:imperative+present is:first+plural	# T5 + mo
SFX xM ïèser isimo-ge/R0 ïèser	ds:imperative+present is:first+plural ds:pronomenal+locative	# T5 + mo
SFX xM ïèser isímoge/R3 ïèser	ds:imperative+present is:first+plural	# T5 + mo
SFX xM ïèser isémogel/R4A1 ïèser	ds:imperative+present is:first+plural	# T5 + mo
SFX xM ïèser isímogel/R4A1 ïèser	ds:imperative+present is:first+plural	# T5 + mo
SFX xM ïèser isémogeƚo/R5A1	ïèser	ds:imperative+present is:first+plural	# T5 + mo
SFX xM ïèser isímogeƚo/R5A1	ïèser	ds:imperative+present is:first+plural	# T5 + mo
SFX xM ïèser ison ïèser	ds:imperative+present is:first+plural	# T12 + ón
SFX xM ïèser ison-ge/R0 ïèser	ds:imperative+present is:first+plural ds:pronomenal+locative	# T12 + ón
SFX xM ïèser isónge/R3 ïèser	ds:imperative+present is:first+plural	# T12 + ón
SFX xM ïèser ison-l/R1 ïèser	ds:imperative+present is:first+plural ds:pronomenal+accusative	# T12 + ón
SFX xM ïèser isóngel/R4A1 ïèser	ds:imperative+present is:first+plural	# T12 + ón
SFX xM ïèser isen ïèser	ds:imperative+present is:first+plural	# T12 + én
SFX xM ïèser isen-ge/R0 ïèser	ds:imperative+present is:first+plural ds:pronomenal+locative	# T12 + én
SFX xM ïèser isénge/R3 ïèser	ds:imperative+present is:first+plural	# T12 + én
SFX xM ïèser isen-l/R1 ïèser	ds:imperative+present is:first+plural ds:pronomenal+accusative	# T12 + én
SFX xM ïèser iséngel/R4A1 ïèser	ds:imperative+present is:first+plural	# T12 + én
SFX xM ïèser iesudo/M0y0 ïèser	ds:participle+passive+weak is:singular+masculine	# T6 + d[oi]
SFX xM ïèser iesuda/F0y0 ïèser	ds:participle+passive+weak is:singular+femenine	# T6 + d[ae]
SFX xM ïèser istado/M0y0 ïèser	ds:participle+passive+weak is:singular+masculine	# T6 + d[oi]
SFX xM ïèser istada/F0y0 ïèser	ds:participle+passive+weak is:singular+femenine	# T6 + d[ae]
SFX xM èser esente/FS èser	ds:participle+active	# T7 + nte
SFX xM ïèser isiante ïèser	ds:participle+active	# T7 + nte
SFX xM èser esènte/FS èser	ds:participle+active	# T7 + nte
SFX xM ser rel/I5 èser	ds:indicative+imperfect is:third ds:interrogative	# T2 + (v)a
SFX xM ïèser ijèrel/I5 ïèser	ds:indicative+imperfect is:third ds:interrogative	# T2 + (v)a
SFX xM ïèser iɉèrel/I5 ïèser	ds:indicative+imperfect is:third ds:interrogative	# T2 + (v)a
SFX xM ïèser ixèrel/I5 ïèser	ds:indicative+imperfect is:third ds:interrogative	# T2 + (v)a
SFX xM èser eséndogel/P4A1 èser	ds:gerund+simple ds:pronomenal+locative	# T2 + ndo = T7 + ndo
SFX xM èser esàndogel/P4A1 èser	ds:gerund+simple ds:pronomenal+locative	# T2 + ndo = T7 + ndo
SFX xM ïèser isiàndogel/P4A1 ïèser	ds:gerund+simple ds:pronomenal+locative	# T2 + ndo = T7 + ndo
SFX xM èser eséndegel/P4A1 èser	ds:gerund+simple ds:pronomenal+locative	# T2 + ndo = T7 + ndo, buranèl
SFX xM èser esàndegel/P4A1 èser	ds:gerund+simple ds:pronomenal+locative	# T2 + ndo = T7 + ndo, buranèl
SFX xM ïèser isiàndegel/P4A1 ïèser	ds:gerund+simple ds:pronomenal+locative	# T2 + ndo = T7 + ndo, buranèl
SFX xM èser eséntogel/P4A1 èser	ds:gerund+simple ds:pronomenal+locative	# T2 + nto = T7 + nto
SFX xM èser esàntogel/P4A1 èser	ds:gerund+simple ds:pronomenal+locative	# T2 + nto = T7 + nto
SFX xM ïèser isiàntogel/P4A1 ïèser	ds:gerund+simple ds:pronomenal+locative	# T2 + nto = T7 + nto
SFX xM èser esèntogel/P4A1 èser	ds:gerund+simple ds:pronomenal+locative	# T2 + nto = T7 + nto
SFX xM ïèser isè ïèser	ds:imperative+present is:second+plural	# T5 = 12 + é
SFX xM ïèser isè-ge/R0 ïèser	ds:imperative+present is:second+plural ds:pronomenal+locative	# T5 = 12 + é
SFX xM ïèser isège/R3 ïèser	ds:imperative+present is:second+plural ds:pronomenal+locative	# T5 = 12 + é
SFX xM ïèser isè-l/R1 ïèser	ds:imperative+present is:second+plural ds:pronomenal+accusative	# T5 = 12 + é
SFX xM ïèser isè-ƚo/R2 ïèser	ds:imperative+present is:second+plural ds:pronomenal+accusative	# T5 = 12 + é
SFX xM ïèser isé ïèser	ds:imperative+present is:second+plural	# T5 = 12 + é
SFX xM ïèser isé-ge/R0 ïèser	ds:imperative+present is:second+plural ds:pronomenal+locative	# T5 = 12 + é
SFX xM ïèser isége/R3 ïèser	ds:imperative+present is:second+plural ds:pronomenal+locative	# T5 = 12 + é
SFX xM ïèser isé-l/R1 ïèser	ds:imperative+present is:second+plural ds:pronomenal+accusative	# T5 = 12 + é
SFX xM ïèser isé-ƚo/R2 ïèser	ds:imperative+present is:second+plural ds:pronomenal+accusative	# T5 = 12 + é
SFX xM ïèser isègel/R4A1 ïèser	ds:imperative+present is:second+plural ds:pronomenal+locative	# T5
SFX xM ïèser iségel/R4A1 ïèser	ds:imperative+present is:second+plural ds:pronomenal+locative	# T5
SFX xM ïèser isí ïèser	ds:imperative+present is:second+plural	# T5
SFX xM ïèser isí-ge/R0 ïèser	ds:imperative+present is:second+plural ds:pronomenal+locative	# T5
SFX xM ïèser isí-l/R1 ïèser	ds:imperative+present is:second+plural ds:pronomenal+accusative	# T5
SFX xM ïèser isí-ƚo/R2 ïèser	ds:imperative+present is:second+plural ds:pronomenal+accusative	# T5
SFX xM ïèser isígel/R4A1 ïèser	ds:imperative+present is:second+plural ds:pronomenal+locative	# T5
SFX xM ser reƚo/i5 èser	ds:indicative+imperfect is:third ds:interrogative	# T2 + (v)a
SFX xM ïèser ijèreƚo/i5 ïèser	ds:indicative+imperfect is:third ds:interrogative	# T2 + (v)a
SFX xM ïèser iɉèreƚo/i5 ïèser	ds:indicative+imperfect is:third ds:interrogative	# T2 + (v)a
